dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- baħri; baħri; 1 -->
    <pardef n="baħri__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- idroġenu; idroġenu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="idroġenu__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- idroġenu; idroġenu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="idroġenu__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- librerija; librerija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="librerija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- akkademja; akkademja; 1 -->
    <pardef n="akkademja__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sitwazzjoni; sitwazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sitwazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ibna; ibna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ibna__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ibna; ibna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ibna__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ta'_sekonda; ta'_sekonda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ta'_sekonda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ta'_sekonda; ta'_sekonda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ta'_sekonda__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xmara; xmara; 1 -->
    <pardef n="xmara__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- duki; duki; 1 -->
    <pardef n="duki__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- siegħa; siegħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="siegħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kewkba; kewkba; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kewkba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kewkba; kewkba; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kewkba__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kullana; kullana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kullana__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- saħara; saħara; 1 -->
    <pardef n="saħara__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali; interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali; 1 -->
    <pardef n="interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġiżirana; ġiżirana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġiżirana__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- brimba; brimba; 1 -->
    <pardef n="brimba__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żennuna; żennuna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żennuna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żennuna; żennuna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żennuna__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pjaċir; pjaċir; 1 -->
    <pardef n="pjaċir__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċriev; ċriev; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċriev__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kompliċità; kompliċità; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kompliċità__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kompliċità; kompliċità; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kompliċità__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġeografija; ġeografija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġeografija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- palladju; palladju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="palladju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- palladju; palladju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="palladju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bliċ; bliċ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bliċ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċpar; ċpar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċpar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żiemel; żiemel; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żiemel__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lumija; lumija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lumija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gvern; gvern; 1 -->
    <pardef n="gvern__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġranet; ġranet; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġranet__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- erezzjoni; erezzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="erezzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġimgħa; ġimgħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġimgħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġimgħa; ġimgħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġimgħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kimiku; kimiku; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kimiku__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kimiku; kimiku; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kimiku__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- astroloġija; astroloġija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="astroloġija__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="baħri"><i>baħri</i><par n="baħri__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="idroġenu"><i>idroġenu</i><par n="idroġenu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="idroġenu"><i>idroġenu</i><par n="idroġenu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="librerija"><i>librerija</i><par n="librerija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="akkademja"><i>akkademja</i><par n="akkademja__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sitwazzjoni"><i>sitwazzjoni</i><par n="sitwazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ibna"><i>ibna</i><par n="ibna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ibna"><i>ibna</i><par n="ibna__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ta'_sekonda"><i>ta'_sekonda</i><par n="ta'_sekonda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ta'_sekonda"><i>ta'_sekonda</i><par n="ta'_sekonda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xmara"><i>xmara</i><par n="xmara__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="duki"><i>duki</i><par n="duki__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="siegħa"><i>siegħa</i><par n="siegħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kewkba"><i>kewkba</i><par n="kewkba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kewkba"><i>kewkba</i><par n="kewkba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kullana"><i>kullana</i><par n="kullana__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saħara"><i>saħara</i><par n="saħara__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali"><i>interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali</i><par n="interazzjoni_gravitazzjonali__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġiżirana"><i>ġiżirana</i><par n="ġiżirana__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="brimba"><i>brimba</i><par n="brimba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żennuna"><i>żennuna</i><par n="żennuna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żennuna"><i>żennuna</i><par n="żennuna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaċir"><i>pjaċir</i><par n="pjaċir__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċriev"><i>ċriev</i><par n="ċriev__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kompliċità"><i>kompliċità</i><par n="kompliċità__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kompliċità"><i>kompliċità</i><par n="kompliċità__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġeografija"><i>ġeografija</i><par n="ġeografija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="palladju"><i>palladju</i><par n="palladju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="palladju"><i>palladju</i><par n="palladju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bliċ"><i>bliċ</i><par n="bliċ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċpar"><i>ċpar</i><par n="ċpar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel"><i>żiemel</i><par n="żiemel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lumija"><i>lumija</i><par n="lumija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gvern"><i>gvern</i><par n="gvern__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġranet"><i>ġranet</i><par n="ġranet__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="erezzjoni"><i>erezzjoni</i><par n="erezzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġimgħa"><i>ġimgħa</i><par n="ġimgħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġimgħa"><i>ġimgħa</i><par n="ġimgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kimiku"><i>kimiku</i><par n="kimiku__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kimiku"><i>kimiku</i><par n="kimiku__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="astroloġija"><i>astroloġija</i><par n="astroloġija__n_GD"/></e>
